California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
Every service supplier or seller in this state shall keep such records pertaining thereto in such form as the department may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 54, Sec. 35.   (SB 96)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

41130.

Upon proper notification to the service supplier or seller, the department or its authorized representative shall have the right to inspect and audit all records and returns of the service supplier or seller at all reasonable times.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 54, Sec. 36.   (SB 96)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

41131.

The department shall have full access to records of the Public Utilities Commission, and any political subdivision or public agency of this state that regulates, operates, or owns a public utility, which pertain to the furnishing of telephone communication services in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 129.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41132.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who is engaged in the business of preparing, or providing services in connection with the preparation of, returns under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 41050), or any person who for compensation prepares any such return for any other person, and who knowingly or recklessly does either of the following, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned no more than one year, or both, together with
 the costs of prosecution:

(1) Discloses any information furnished to him or her for, or in connection with, the preparation of the return.

(2) Uses that information for any purpose other than to prepare, or assist in preparing, the return.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to disclosure of information if that disclosure is made pursuant to the person’s consent or pursuant to a subpoena, court order, or other compulsory legal process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

41133.

(a) The department shall determine which service supplier’s or seller’s accounts are eligible for the managed audit program in a manner that is consistent with the efficient use of its auditing resources and the maximum effectiveness of the program.

(b) A service supplier or seller is not required to participate in the managed audit program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 130.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41133.1.

A service supplier’s or seller’s account is eligible for the managed audit program only if the service supplier or seller meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The service supplier’s or seller’s business involves few or no statutory exemptions.

(b) The service supplier’s or seller’s business involves a single or small number of clearly defined taxability issues.

(c) The service supplier or seller pays a surcharge pursuant to this part and agrees to participate in the managed audit program.

(d) The service supplier
 or seller has the resources to comply with the managed audit instructions provided by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 131.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41133.2.

(a) If the department selects a service supplier’s or seller’s account for a managed audit, all of the following apply:

(1) The department shall identify all of the following:

(A) The audit period covered by the managed audit.

(B) The types of transactions covered by the managed audit.

(C) The specific procedures that the service supplier or seller is to follow in determining any liability.

(D) The records to be reviewed by the service supplier or
 seller.

(E) The manner in which the types of transactions are to be scheduled for review.

(F) The time period for completion of the managed audit.

(G) The time period for the payment of the liability and interest.

(H) Any other criteria that the department may require for completion of the managed audit.

(2) The service supplier or seller shall:

(A) Examine its records and returns to determine if it has any unreported surcharge liability for the audit period.

(B) Make available to
 the department for verification all
 computations and records and returns examined pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(b) The information provided by the service supplier or seller pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is the same information that is required for the completion of any other audit that the department may conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 132.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41133.3.

This article does not limit the department’s authority to inspect and audit all records and returns of a service supplier or seller under Section 41130.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 133.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41133.4.

Upon completion of the managed audit and verification by the department, interest on any unpaid liability shall be computed at one-half the rate that would otherwise be imposed for liabilities covered by the audit period. Payment of the liabilities and interest shall be made within the time period specified by the department. If the requirements for the managed audit are not satisfied, the department may proceed to examine the records of the service supplier or seller in a manner to be determined by the department under law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 134.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Disposition of Proceeds [41135. - 41142.]

41135.

(a) All amounts required to be paid to the state under this part shall be paid to the department in the form of remittances payable to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration. The department shall transmit the revenues to the State Treasurer to be deposited in the State Treasury to either the credit of the State Emergency Telephone Number Account in the General Fund, or the 988 State Suicide and Behavioral Health Crisis Services Fund, depending on the apportionment of the revenues arising from each surcharge.

(b) The department, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services and the Office of Emergency Services, may adopt
 regulations to implement the apportionment of the revenues from each surcharge.

(c) The department shall submit an annual report to the State Department of Health Care Services and the Office of Emergency Services on revenue generated by the 988 surcharge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 252, Sec. 14.   (AB 173)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

41136.

(a) From the funds in the State Emergency Telephone Number Account, all amounts of the 911 surcharge collected shall, when appropriated by the Legislature, be spent solely for the following purposes:

(1) To pay refunds authorized by this part.

(2) To pay the department for the cost of the administration of the 911 surcharge under this part.

(3) To pay the Office of Emergency Services for its costs in administration of the “911” emergency telephone number system.

(4) To pay bills submitted to the Office of Emergency Services by service suppliers or communications
 equipment companies for the installation of, and ongoing expenses for, the following communications services supplied to local agencies in connection with the “911” emergency phone number system:

(A) A basic system, defined as 911 systems, including, but not limited to, Next Generation 911, and the subsequent technologies, and interfaces needed to deliver 911 voice and data information from the 911 caller to the emergency responder and the subsequent technologies, and interfaces needed to send information, including, but not limited to, alerts and warnings, to potential 911 callers.

(B) A basic system with telephone central office identification.

(C) A system employing automatic call routing.

(D) Approved incremental costs.

(5) To pay claims of local agencies for approved incremental costs, not previously compensated for by another governmental agency.

(6) To pay claims of local agencies for incremental costs and amounts, not previously compensated for by another governmental agency, incurred prior to the effective date of this part, for the installation and ongoing expenses for the following communication services supplied in connection with the “911” emergency telephone number system:

(A) A basic system, defined as 911 systems, including, but not limited to, Next Generation 911, and the subsequent technologies, and interfaces needed to deliver 911 voice and data information from the 911 caller to the emergency responder and the subsequent technologies, and interfaces needed to send information, including, but not limited to, alerts and
 warnings, to potential 911 callers.

(B) A basic system with telephone central office identification.

(C) A system employing automatic call routing.

(D) Approved incremental costs. Incremental costs shall not be allowed unless the costs are concurred in by the Office of Emergency Services.

(b) (1) From the funds in the 988 State Suicide and Behavioral Health Crisis Services Fund, all amounts of the 988 surcharge collected shall be spent for purposes identified in Section 53123.4 of the Government Code. However, before funds are disbursed as provided in Section 53123.4 of the Government Code, funds shall be used for all of the following:

(A) To pay refunds authorized by
 this part.

(B) To pay the department for the cost of the administration of the 988 surcharge under this part.

(C) To pay other state departments for their costs in administration of the 988 Suicide & Crisis Lifeline.

(2) The remainder of the revenue shall be disbursed to the State Department of Health Care Services and the Office of Emergency Services for the purposes identified in Section 53123.4 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 252, Sec. 15.   (AB 173)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

41136.1.

For each fiscal year, moneys in the State Emergency Telephone Number Account not appropriated for a purpose specified in Section 41136 shall be held in trust for future appropriation for upcoming, planned “911” emergency telephone number projects that have been approved by the Office of Emergency Services, even if the projects have not yet commenced.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 82.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

41137.

The Office of Emergency Services shall pay, from funds appropriated from the State Emergency Telephone Number Account by the Legislature, as provided in Section 41138, bills submitted by service suppliers or communications equipment companies for the installation and ongoing costs of the following communication services provided to local agencies by service suppliers in connection with the “911” emergency telephone number system:

(a) A basic system, defined as 911 systems, including, but not limited to, Next Generation 911, and the subsequent technologies, and interfaces needed to deliver 911 voice and data information from the 911 caller to the emergency responder and the subsequent technologies, and interfaces needed to send information, including, but not limited to, alerts and
 warnings, to potential 911 callers.

(b) A basic system with telephone central office identification.

(c) A system employing automatic call routing.

(d) Approved incremental costs that have been concurred in by the Office of Emergency Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 262.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

41137.1.

The Office of Emergency Services shall pay, from funds appropriated from the State Emergency Telephone Number Account by the Legislature, as provided in Section 41138, claims submitted by local agencies for approved incremental costs and for the cost of preparation of final plans submitted to the Office of Emergency Services for approval on or before October 1, 1978, as provided in Section 53115 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 84.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

41138.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the reimbursement rates for “911” emergency telephone number equipment shall not exceed specified amounts negotiated with each interested supplier and approved by the Office of Emergency Services. The Office of Emergency Services shall negotiate supplier pricing to ensure cost-effectiveness and the best value for the “911” emergency telephone number system.
 The Office of Emergency Services shall pay those bills as provided in Section 41137 only under the following conditions:

(1) The Office of Emergency Services shall have received the local agency’s “911” emergency telephone number system plan by July 1 of the prior fiscal year and approved the plan by October 1 of the prior fiscal year.

(2) The Legislature has appropriated in the Budget Bill an amount sufficient to pay those bills.

(3) The Office of Emergency Services has reviewed and approved each line item of a request for funding to ensure the necessity of the proposed equipment or services and the eligibility for reimbursement.

(4) The amounts to be paid do not exceed the pricing submitted by the supplier and approved by the Office of Emergency
 Services. Extraordinary circumstances may warrant spending in excess of the established rate, but shall be preapproved by the Office of Emergency Services. In determining the reimbursement rate, the Office of Emergency Services shall utilize the approved pricing submitted by the supplier providing the equipment or service.

(b) This section shall not be construed to limit an agency’s ability to select a supplier or procure telecommunications equipment as long as the supplier’s pricing is preapproved by the Office of Emergency Services. Agencies shall be encouraged to procure equipment on a competitive basis. Any amount in excess of the pricing approved by the Office of Emergency Services shall not be reimbursed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 85.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

41139.

From funds appropriated by the Legislature from the Emergency Telephone Number Account, the Office of Emergency Services shall begin paying bills as provided in Sections 41137, 41137.1, and 41138 in the 1977–78 fiscal year for plans submitted by local agencies by July 1, 1976, to the Office of Emergency Services which the Office of Emergency Services has approved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 86.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

41140.

The Office of Emergency Services shall reimburse local agencies, from funds appropriated from the Emergency Telephone Number Account by the Legislature, for amounts not previously compensated for by another governmental agency, which have been paid by agencies for approved incremental costs or to service suppliers or communication equipment companies for the following communications services supplied in connection with the “911”
 emergency telephone number, provided local agency plans had been approved by the Office of Emergency Services:

(a) A basic system, defined as 911 systems, including, but not limited to, Next Generation 911, and the subsequent technologies, and interfaces needed to deliver 911 voice and data information from the 911 caller to the emergency responder and the subsequent technologies, and interfaces needed to send information, including, but not limited to, alerts and warnings, to potential 911 callers.

(b) A basic system with telephone central office identification.

(c) A system employing automatic call routing.

(d) Approved incremental costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 54, Sec. 40.   (SB 96)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

41141.

Claims for reimbursement shall be submitted by local agencies to the Office of Emergency Services, which shall determine payment eligibility and shall reduce the claim for charges that exceed the approved incremental costs, approved contract amounts, or the established tariff rates for costs. No claim shall be paid until funds are appropriated by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 88.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

41142.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, if the Legislature fails to appropriate an amount sufficient to pay bills submitted to the Office of Emergency Services by service suppliers or communications equipment companies for the installation and ongoing communications services supplied local agencies in connection with the “911” emergency telephone number system, and to pay claims of local agencies which, prior
 to the effective date of this part, paid amounts to service suppliers or communications equipment companies for the installation and ongoing expenses in connection with the “911” emergency telephone number system, the obligation of service suppliers and local agencies to provide “911” emergency telephone service shall terminate and service shall not again be required until the Legislature has appropriated an amount sufficient to pay those bills or claims. This part shall not preclude local agencies from purchasing or acquiring any communication equipment from companies other than the telephone service suppliers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 89.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Violations [41143. - 41143.8.]

41143.

Any person who fails or refuses to file a return or report required to be made or who fails or refuses to furnish a supplemental report or other data required by the department, or who renders a false or fraudulent report is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 135.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41143.4.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, any person who violates this part with intent to defeat or evade the determination of an amount due required by law to be made is guilty of a felony when the amount of tax liability aggregates twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more in any 12-consecutive-month period. The determination shall be approved by the director or their designee. Each offense shall be punished by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and not more than twenty thousand
 dollars ($20,000), or imprisonment for 16 months, two years, or three years, or by both the fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 36.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41143.8.

Any prosecution for violation of any of the penal provisions of this part shall be instituted within three years after commission of the offense or within two years after the violation is discovered, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1361, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Notices [41144. - 41144.]

41144.

A certificate by the department or an employee of the department stating that a notice required by this part was given by mailing or personal service shall be prima facie evidence in any administrative or judicial proceeding of the fact and regularity of the mailing of personal service in accordance with any requirement of this part for the giving of notice. Unless otherwise specifically required, any notice required by this part to be mailed or served may be given by mailing or personal service in the manner provided for giving notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 136.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Purpose [41150. - 41152.]

41150.

(a) The Legislature hereby declares and finds that to enable public agencies to implement “911” emergency phone systems required by the provisions of Chapter 1005 of the 1972 Regular Session (Article 6 (commencing with Section 53100) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) it is necessary that a surcharge be imposed upon each access line in the state and upon the purchase of prepaid mobile telephony services in this state for access to the 911 emergency communication system. This act will provide funding for basic 911, as defined in Section 41136, and the technology and interfaces needed to deliver 911 voice and data information from the 911 caller to the emergency responder and the subsequent technologies, and
 interfaces needed to send information, including, but not limited to, alerts and warnings, to potential 911 callers. In addition, this part will provide funding for incremental costs.

(b) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that to enable public agencies to implement the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline required by the provisions of the Miles Hall Lifeline and Suicide Prevention Act (Article 6.3 (commencing with Section 53123.1) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) it is necessary that a surcharge be imposed upon access lines purchased by every person in the state for access to the 988
 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline. This act, as amended by the act adding this subdivision, will provide funding, in part, for 988 centers and mobile crisis team operations and services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 37.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41152.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Access to emergency telephone service has been a longstanding goal of the state.

(b) The Emergency Telephone Users Surcharge Act remains an important means for making emergency telephone service available to every person in this state.

(c) Every reasonable means should be employed by telephone corporations
 and every provider of telephone quality communication to ensure that every person using their service is informed of and is afforded the opportunity to use emergency telephone service, regardless of the means by which emergency telephone calls are placed.

(d) The furnishing of emergency telephone service is in the public interest and should be supported fairly and equitably by every telephone corporation and every provider of telephone quality communication in a way that is equitable, nondiscriminatory, and competitively neutral.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 17, Sec. 13.   Effective May 21, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. The California Taxpayers’ Bill of Rights [41160. - 41176.]

41160.

The department shall administer this article. Unless the context indicates otherwise, the provisions of this article shall apply to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 138.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41161.

(a) The department shall establish the position of the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate. The advocate or that person’s designee shall be responsible for facilitating resolution of taxpayer complaints and problems, including any taxpayer complaints regarding unsatisfactory treatment of taxpayers by
 department employees and staying actions where taxpayers have suffered or will suffer irreparable loss as the result of those actions. Applicable statutes of limitation shall be tolled during the pendency of a stay. Any penalties and interest that would otherwise accrue shall not be affected by the granting of a stay.

(b) The advocate shall report directly to the director of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 139.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41162.

(a) The department shall develop and implement an education and information program directed at, but not limited to, all of the following groups:

(1) Taxpayers newly registered with the department.

(2) Department audit and compliance staff.

(b) The education and information program shall include all of the following:

(1) A program of written communication with newly registered taxpayers explaining in simplified terms their duties and responsibilities.

(2) Participation in seminars and similar programs organized by federal, state, and local agencies.

(3) Revision of taxpayer educational materials currently produced by the department that explain the most common areas of taxpayer nonconformance in simplified terms.

(4) Implementation of a continuing education program for audit and compliance personnel to include the application of new legislation to taxpayer activities and areas of recurrent taxpayer noncompliance or inconsistency of
 administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 140.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41163.

The department shall conduct an annual hearing to allow industry representatives and individual taxpayers to present proposals on changes to the Emergency Telephone Users Surcharge Act to further improve voluntary compliance and the relationship between taxpayers and the government.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 24.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

41164.

The department shall prepare and publish brief but comprehensive statements in simple and nontechnical language that explain procedures, remedies, and the rights and obligations of the department and taxpayers. As appropriate, statements shall be provided to taxpayers with the initial notice of audit, the notice of proposed additional surcharges, any subsequent notice of surcharge due, or other substantive notices. Additionally, the department shall include this language for statements in the annual tax information bulletins that are mailed to taxpayers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 142.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41165.

(a) The total amount of revenue collected or assessed pursuant to this part shall not be used for any of the following:

(1) To evaluate individual officers or employees.

(2) To impose or suggest production quotas or goals, other than quotas or goals with respect to accounts receivable.

(b) The department shall certify in its annual report submitted pursuant to Section 15616 of the Government Code that
 revenue collected or assessed is not used in a manner prohibited by subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall not prohibit the setting of goals and the evaluation of performance with respect to productivity and the efficient use of time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 143.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41166.

The department shall develop and implement a program that will evaluate an individual employee’s or officer’s performance with respect to that person’s contact with taxpayers. The development and implementation of the program shall be coordinated with the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 144.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41167.

The department shall, in cooperation with the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate, and other interested taxpayer-oriented groups, develop a plan to reduce the time required to resolve petitions for redetermination and claims for refunds. The plan shall include determination of standard timeframes and special review of cases which take more time than the appropriate standard timeframe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 145.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41168.

Procedures of the department, relating to appeals staff review conferences before a staff attorney or supervising tax auditor independent of the assessing department, shall include all of the following:

(a) Any conference shall be held at a reasonable time at a department office that is convenient to the taxpayer.

(b) The conference may be recorded only if prior notice is given to the taxpayer and the taxpayer is entitled to receive a copy of the recording.

(c) The taxpayer shall be informed prior to any conference that the taxpayer has a
 right to have present at the conference an attorney, accountant, or other designated agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 146.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41169.

(a) Every taxpayer is entitled to be reimbursed for any reasonable fees and expenses related to a hearing before the department if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The taxpayer files a claim for the fee and expenses with the department within one year of the date the decision of the
 department becomes final.

(2) The department, in its sole discretion, finds that the action taken by the department staff was unreasonable.

(3) The department decides that the taxpayer be awarded a specific amount of fees and expenses related to the hearing, in an amount determined by the department in its sole discretion.

(b) To determine whether the department staff has been unreasonable, the department shall consider whether the department staff has established that its position was substantially justified.

(c) The amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to the following:

(1) Fees and expenses incurred after the date of the notice of determination, jeopardy determination, or a claim for refund.

(2) If the department finds that the staff was unreasonable with respect to certain issues but reasonable with respect to other issues, the amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to those that relate to the issues where the staff was unreasonable.

(d) Any proposed award by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the award.

(e) The amendments to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for claims filed on or after January 1,
 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 147.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41170.

(a) An officer or employee of the department acting in connection with any law administered by the department shall not knowingly authorize, require, or conduct any investigation of, or surveillance over, any person for nontax administration related purposes.

(b) Any person violating subdivision (a) shall be subject to disciplinary action in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, including dismissal from office or discharge from employment.

(c) This section shall not apply with respect to any otherwise lawful investigation concerning organized crime activities.

(d) The provisions of this section are not intended to prohibit, restrict, or prevent the exchange of information where the person is being investigated for multiple violations which include emergency telephone users surcharge violations.

(e) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Investigation” means any oral or written inquiry directed to any person, organization, or governmental agency.

(2) “Surveillance” means the monitoring of persons, places, or
 events by means of electronic interception, overt or covert observations, or photography, and the use of informants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 148.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41171.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department, its staff, and the Attorney General pursue settlements as authorized under this section with respect to surcharge matters in dispute that are the subject of protests, appeals, or refund claims, consistent with a reasonable evaluation of the costs and risks associated with litigation of these matters.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no recommendation of settlement shall be submitted to the director for approval unless and until that recommendation has been submitted by the chief counsel to the Attorney General. Within 30 days of receiving that recommendation,
 the Attorney General shall review the recommendation and advise the chief counsel, in writing, of their conclusions as to whether the recommendation is reasonable from an overall perspective. The chief counsel shall, with each recommendation of settlement submitted to the director also submit the Attorney General’s written conclusions obtained pursuant to this paragraph.

(2) (A) A settlement of any civil surcharge matter in dispute involving a reduction of surcharge or penalties in settlement, the total of which reduction of surcharge and penalties in settlement does not exceed eleven thousand five hundred dollars ($11,500), may be approved by the director.

(B) Beginning on July 1, 2029, and each fifth fiscal year thereafter, the department shall
 adjust the amount specified in subparagraph (A) by increasing that amount by a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the Department of Finance with the resulting amount rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100). The first adjustment pursuant to this subparagraph shall be a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index from January 1, 2024, to January 1, 2029. Subsequent fifth fiscal year adjustments shall cover subsequent five-year periods. The incremental change shall be added to the previously adjusted amount.

(c) Whenever a reduction of surcharge, or penalties, or total surcharge and penalties in settlement in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved pursuant to this section, there shall be placed on file, for at least one
 year, in the office of the director of the department a public record with respect to that settlement. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name or names of the surcharge payers who are parties to the settlement.

(2) The total amount in dispute.

(3) The amount agreed to pursuant to the settlement.

(4) A summary of the reasons why the settlement is in the best interests of the State of California.

(5) (A) For any settlement approved by the
 director, except those settlements approved pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the Attorney General’s conclusion as to whether the recommendation of settlement was reasonable from an overall perspective.

(B) The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secret, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure that, if disclosed, would adversely affect the surcharge payer or the national defense.

(d) The director shall not participate in the settlement of surcharge matters pursuant to this section, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(e) (1) Any recommendation for settlement shall be approved or
 disapproved by the director within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation to the director. Any recommendation for settlement that is not either approved or disapproved by the director within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation shall be deemed approved.

(2) Where the director disapproves a recommendation for settlement, at the discretion of the director and chief counsel, the matter shall be remanded to staff for further negotiation, and may be resubmitted to the director, in the same manner and subject to the same requirements as the initial submission.

(f) All settlements entered into pursuant to this section shall be final and nonappealable, except upon a showing of fraud or misrepresentation with respect to a material fact.

(g) The Legislature finds that it is essential for fiscal purposes that the settlement program authorized by this section be expeditiously implemented. Accordingly, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the department in implementing and administering the settlement program authorized by this section.

(h) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to any settlements approved on or after January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 25.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

41171.5.

(a) Beginning on January 1, 2007, the director of the department, or their delegates, may compromise any final surcharge liability.

(b) For purposes of this section, “a final surcharge liability” means any final surcharge liability arising under Part 20 (commencing with Section 41001), or related interest, additions to the surcharge, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part.

(c) (1) Offers in compromise shall be considered only for liabilities that were generated from a business that has been discontinued or transferred, where the surcharge payer making the offer no longer has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business or has a controlling
 interest or association with a similar type of business as the transferred or discontinued business.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a qualified final surcharge liability may be compromised regardless of whether the business has been discontinued or transferred or whether the surcharge payer has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business as the transferred or discontinued business. All other provisions of this section that apply to a final surcharge liability shall also apply to a qualified final surcharge liability, and a compromise shall not be made under this subdivision unless all other requirements of this section are met. For purposes of this subdivision, a “qualified final surcharge liability” means either of the following:

(A) That part of a final surcharge liability, including related interest, additions to the surcharge, penalties, or other
 amounts assessed under this part, arising from a transaction or transactions in which the department finds no evidence that the service supplier collected the surcharge from the service user or other person and which was determined against the service supplier under Article 3 (commencing with Section 41070), Article 4 (commencing with Section 41080), or Article 5 (commencing with Section 41085) of Chapter 4.
